Illinois, session 104th, SB189.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Swimming Facility Act is amended by 5changing Section 13 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 125/13)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1213)7    Sec. 13. Rules. The Department shall promulgate, publish, 8adopt and amend such rules as may be necessary for the proper 9enforcement of this Act, to protect the health and safety of 10the public using swimming facilities and their appurtenances, 11and may, when necessary, utilize the services of any other 12state agencies to assist in carrying out the purposes of this 13Act. These rules shall include but are not limited to design 14criteria for swimming facility areas, aquatic features 15including overhead systems or similar interactive equipment, 16and bather preparation facilities, standards relating to 17sanitation, cleanliness, plumbing, water supply, sewage and 18solid waste disposal, design and construction of all 19equipment, buildings, rodent and insect control, communicable 20disease control, safety and sanitation of appurtenant swimming 21facilities. The rules must include provisions for the 22prevention of bather entrapment or entanglement at new and 23existing swimming facilities. Bather preparation facilities   SB0189 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07404 BAB 17445 b1consisting of dressing room space, toilets and showers shall 2be available for use of patrons of swimming facilities, except 3as provided by Department rules.4(Source: P.A. 96-1081, eff. 7-16-10; 97-957, eff. 1-1-13.)